Utah statutes.
11-44-202.   Types of agreements.

Notwithstanding Section 63G-6a-1205, a political subdivision shall structure an energy service agreement as a guaranteed energy savings performance contract, which shall include:

(1)  the design and installation of an energy efficiency measure, if applicable;

(2)  operation and maintenance of any energy efficiency measure implemented; and

(3)  guaranteed annual cost savings that meet or exceed the total annual contract payments by the political subdivision under the contract, including financing charges incurred by the political subdivision over the life of the contract.



Amended by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session

